vi: Hình dạng đồ nướng: Hình bánh Bundt; Chữ nhật; Mũi giày tròn; Springform; Mũi giày vuông; Khác
en: Bakeware shape: Bundt; Rectangular; Round; Springform; Square; Other
fi: Leivonnaisten muoto: kuivakakku; Suorakulmainen; Pyöreä; Irtopohja; Neliömäinen; Muu
hu: Sütőeszköz alakja: Kuglóf; Szögletes; Kerek; Kapcsos tortaforma; Kocka; Egyéb
zh-CN: 烘焙用具形状: 圆环; 矩形; 圆头; 弹簧形式; 方形; 其他
ko: 빵틀: 번트; 직사각형; 라운드; 스프링폼; 스퀘어; 기타
cs: Tvar pečicího nádobí: Bábovka; Obdélníkový; Oválná; Pružinový; Čtvercová; Jiné
da: Form af bageform: Bundt; Rektangulær; Rund; Springform; Firkant; Andet
hr-HR: Oblik posuđa za pečenje: Kuglof; Pravokutni; Okrugli; S odvojivim rubom; Kvadratni; Ostalo
fr: Forme de l'ustensile de cuisson: Moule Cheminée; Rectangulaire; Rond; Moule à manqué; Carré; Autre
sk-SK: Tvar nádoby na pečenie: Bábovka; Obdĺžnikový; Okrúhly; Pružinový; Štvorcový; Iné
de: Backformenform: Napfkuchen; Rechteckig; Rund; Springform; Quadrat; Sonstiges
sl-SI: Oblika izdelkov za peko: Bundt; Pravokoten; Okrogel; Za torte; Kvadraten; Drugo
ro-RO: Formă vase pentru copt: Formă de copt bundt; Dreptunghiular; Rotund; Cu arc; Pătrat; Altele
it: Forma della teglia: Ciambella; Rettangolare; Rotondo; Stampo a cerniera; Quadrata; Altro
th: รูปทรงอุปกรณ์ทำเบเกอรี่: บันด์; แบบสี่เหลี่ยมผืนผ้า; ทรงกลม; แบบสปริง; ทรงเหลี่ยม; อื่นๆ
nb: Bakeutstyrsform: Bundt; Rektangulær; Rund; Springform; Firkantet; Annen
ja: 耐熱材の形状: バント; 長方形; ラウンド; スプリングフォーム; スクエア; その他
zh-TW: 烘焙用具形狀: 圓環蛋糕; 長方形; 圓頭; 彈簧形; 方頭; 其他
pl: Kształt form do pieczenia: Wiązka; Prostokątna; Runda; Springform; Kwadrat; Pozostałe
lt-LT: Kepimo indo forma: Apvali tuščiavidurė; Stačiakampė; Apvali; Atsegama; Kvadratinė; Kita
pt-BR: Forma da assadeira: Pacote; Retangular; Redondo; Em forma de mola; Quadrado; Outro
ru: Форма жаропрочной посуды: Форма для кекса бундт; Прямоугольник; Круг; Разъемная форма; Квадрат; Другое
sv: Form på bakningsverktyg: Bundt; Rektangulär; Rund; Fjäderform; Fyrkantig; Annat
nl: Vorm bakgerei: Tulband; Rechthoekig; Rond; Springvorm; Vierkant; Andere
pt-PT: Forma de assadeira: Bolo bundt; Retangular; Redondo; Forma de mola; Quadrado; Outro
tr: Fırın kabı şekli: Delikli kek kalıbı; Dikdörtgen; Yuvarlak; Yay formu; Kare; Diğer
el: Σχήμα σκευών ψησίματος: Στρογγυλό με τρύπα στη μέση; Ορθογώνιο; Στρογγυλό; Με αποσπώμενη βάση; Τετράγωνο; Άλλο
bg-BG: Форма на съда за печене: Кекс; Правоъгълна; Кръгла; Форма със затягане; Квадратна; Други
es: Forma de los utensilios para hornear: Bundt; Rectangular; Redondo; Springform; Cuadrado; Otros